Massachusetts, session 194th, H518.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
(a) Any parent or legal guardian wishing to educate their child at home shall only be
required to submit a one-time letter of intent to the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education (DESE) indicating their decision to homeschool. No further annual notifications are
required unless the family moves to a different district.
(b) The letter of intent shall include the name, age, and grade level of each child being
homeschooled, the address where the homeschooling will take place, and a statement of intent to
provide an education in accordance with the laws of the Commonwealth.
Section 2. Curriculum and Assessment
(a) Homeschooling families shall have the autonomy to choose the curriculum, teaching
methods, and educational materials without state oversight, except where such education must
include basic subjects like reading, writing, history, civics, math, and science.
of 3

(b) No state-mandated assessments or standardized testing shall be required for
homeschooled students unless the parent opts into such assessments voluntarily.
Section 3. Educational Innovation and Alternative Models
(a) Establishment. Any individual or group may establish an alternative education model
by registering with the DESE as an "Educational Innovation Entity" (EIE). This registration shall
not require any specific credentials or state approval beyond the submission of a basic
educational plan.
(b) Plan Contents. The educational plan shall outline the educational philosophy or
model, the primary subjects or skills to be taught, and methods of evaluation or demonstration of
student progress, which may include portfolios, exhibitions, or other non-traditional assessments.
(c) Funding and Support. The state shall create an "Innovation in Education Fund" to
which EIEs can apply for grants to support curriculum development, facility costs, or other
educational expenses. This fund will be supported by reallocating a portion of the education
budget based on the number of students in alternative models and seeking private donations or
federal grants aimed at educational innovation.
(d) Regulatory Relief. EIEs are exempt from traditional public school regulations
concerning teacher certification, curriculum standards, and mandatory standardized testing, and
from local zoning laws specifically related to educational use, provided safety and health codes
are met.
of 3

(e) Student Enrollment. Students enrolled in an EIE shall be considered as fulfilling
compulsory education requirements. They may also participate in public school extracurricular
activities if agreed upon by local school districts.
Section 4. Oversight and Accountability
(a) While specific state oversight is minimized, EIEs must maintain records of student
progress and be prepared to provide them if a complaint is lodged against the entity concerning
educational quality or child welfare.
(b) The DESE shall conduct periodic, non-intrusive reviews of EIEs to ensure broad
compliance with the educational objectives set forth in their plans, focusing on student outcomes
rather than process.
of 3